Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB495.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1723-A(d)(1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1723-A. Enrollment.--* * *(d) (1) [Enrollment] Except as provided under paragraph (1.1), enrollment of students in a charter school or cyber charter school shall not be subject to a cap or otherwise limited by any past or future action of a board of school directors, a board of control established under Article XVII-B, a special board of control established under section 692 or any 12345678910111213141516171819 other governing authority, unless agreed to by the charter school or cyber charter school as part of a written charter pursuant to section 1720-A.(1.1) Enrollment of students in a charter school or regional charter school shall be subject to a cap on students who reside in the district or districts in which the charter school is physically located or in which the regional charter school is chartered as part of a written charter under section 1720-A. The enrollment cap shall be approved by the local board of school directors of a school district or by the local boards of school directors of a school district in the case of a regional charter school. The enrollment cap shall not preclude a charter school from enrolling students from districts outside of the physical location of the charter school or in the case of a regional charter school, from districts outside of where the regional charter school is chartered.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0495PN0484 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718